en: Compatible clarinet mouthpiece ligature: German/Oehler (narrow) ligature; Oversized/large bore ligature; Standard Bb/A clarinet ligature; Universal/adjustable; Use included ligature; Other
pt-PT: Braçadeira compatível para boquilha de clarinete: Braçadeira alemã/Oehler (estreita); Braçadeira de grande diâmetro; Braçadeira de clarinete Bb/A padrão; Universal/ajustável; Utilizar braçadeira incluída; Outra
zh-CN: 适配单簧管笛头卡箍: 德式/厄勒（窄款）卡子; 超大/大内径卡子; 标准降 B/A 调单簧管卡子; 通用/可调节; 使用随附的卡子; 其他
zh-TW: 相容的單簧管吹嘴束圈: 德式/Oehler (窄) 束圈; 超大/大內徑束圈; 標準降 B/A 調單簧管束圈; 通用/可調式; 使用隨附束圈; 其他
fr: Ligature compatible pour bec de clarinette: Ligature allemande/Oehler (étroite); Ligature surdimensionnée / à large perce; Ligature standard pour clarinette Sib/La; Universelle / réglable; Utiliser la ligature incluse; Autre
ja: 互換性のあるクラリネットマウスピースリガチャー: ドイツ式 / エーラー式 (細め) リガチャー; オーバーサイズ / ラージボアリガチャー; 標準のB♭ / Aクラリネットリガチャー; 汎用 / 調整可能; 付属のリガチャーを使用; その他
it: Legatura compatibile per bocchino di clarinetto: Legatura tedesca/Oehler (stretta); Legatura oversize/a canneggio largo; Legatura standard per clarinetto in Si bemolle/La; Universale/regolabile; Usa legatura inclusa; Altro
ru: Совместимая лигатура для мундштука кларнета: Немецкая/система Элера (узкая); Увеличенная/для широкой мензуры; Стандартная для кларнетов Bb/A; Универсальная/регулируемая; Использовать лигатуру в комплекте; Другое
vi: Kẹp giữ lưỡi kèn clarinet tương thích: Đai dăm kèn German/Oehler (hẹp); Đai dăm kèn cỡ lớn/lỗ lớn; Đai dăm kèn clarinet Bb/A tiêu chuẩn; Đa năng/có thể điều chỉnh; Sử dụng đai dăm kèn đi kèm; Khác
es: Ligadura compatible con la boquilla de clarinete: Abrazadera alemana/Oehler (estrecha); Abrazadera extragrande/de calibre grande; Abrazadera estándar para clarinete en Si bemol/La; Universal/ajustable; Usa la abrazadera incluida; Otra
hr-HR: Kompatibilna ligatura za usnik klarineta: Njemačka/Oehlerova (uska) ligatura; Ligatura velikog promjera / za široku cijev; Standardna ligatura za Bb/A klarinet; Univerzalno / podesivo; Upotrijebite uključenu ligaturu; Ostalo
ro-RO: Ligatură compatibilă pentru muștiuc de clarinet: Brățară Germană/Oehler (îngustă); Brățară supradimensionată/cu orificiu mare; Brățară standard pentru clarinet Bb/A; Universală/ajustabilă; Utilizați brățara inclusă; Altele
th: ตัวรัดปากเป่าคลาริเน็ตที่เข้ากันได้: สายรัดปากเป่าแบบเยอรมัน/Oehler (แคบ); สายรัดปากเป่าขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ/ท่อลมใหญ่; สายรัดปากเป่าคลาริเน็ต Bb/A มาตรฐาน; อเนกประสงค์/ปรับได้; ใช้สายรัดปากเป่าที่แถมมา; อื่นๆ
nb: Kompatibel ligatur for klarinettmunnstykke: Tysk/Oehler-ligatur (smal); Stor/overdimensjonert ligatur; Standardligatur for Bb-/A-klarinett; Universell/justerbar; Bruk medfølgende ligatur; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva klarinetin suukappaleen ligatuuri: Saksalainen/Oehler-ligatuuri (kapea); Ylisuuri/suuren porauksen ligatuuri; Vakio Bb/A-klarinettiligatuuri; Universaali/säädettävä; Käytä mukana tulevaa ligatuuria; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinama klarneto kandiklio ligatūra: Vokiška / Oehler (siaura) ligatūra; Padidinta / plataus kanalo ligatūra; Standartinė Bb/A klarneto ligatūra; Universali / reguliuojama; Naudoti pridedamą ligatūrą; Kita
tr: Klarnet ağızlığı ile uyumlu ligatür: Alman/Oehler (dar) bilezik; Büyük boy/geniş çaplı bilezik; Standart Bb/A klarnet bileziği; Evrensel/ayarlanabilir; Birlikte verilen bileziği kullanın; Diğer
pt-BR: Braçadeira compatível para boquilha de clarinete: Abraçadeira alemã/Oehler (estreita); Abraçadeira extragrande/de calibre largo; Abraçadeira de clarinete Sib/Lá padrão; Universal/ajustável; Usar abraçadeira inclusa; Outro
de: Kompatible Klarinettenmundstück-Ligatur: Deutsch/Oehler (schmale) Blattschraube; Übergroße/Large-Bore-Blattschraube; Standard-Blattschraube für B/A-Klarinette; Universal/verstellbar; Mitgelieferte Blattschraube verwenden; Sonstige
pl: Kompatybilna ligatura ustnika klarnetu: Ligatura niemiecka/Oehlera (wąska); Powiększona ligatura / o dużej średnicy; Standardowa ligatura do klarnetu Bb/A; Uniwersalna/regulowana; Użyj dołączonej ligatury; Inne
hu: Kompatibilis klarinétfúvóka ligatúra: Német/Oehler (keskeny) ligatúra; Túlméretes/nagy furatú ligatúra; Normál Bb/A klarinét ligatúra; Univerzális/állítható; A mellékelt ligatúra használandó; Egyéb
nl: Compatibele klarinetmondstuk ligatuur: Duitse/Oehler (smalle) rietbinder; Oversized/grote boring-rietbinder; Standaard Bes/A-klarinet-rietbinder; Universeel/verstelbaar; Gebruik meegeleverde rietbinder; Overig
el: Συμβατός σφιγκτήρας για επιστόμιο κλαρινέτου: Σφιγκτήρας γερμανικού συστήματος/Oehler (στενός); Σφιγκτήρας υπερμεγέθης/μεγάλου αυλού; Τυπικός σφιγκτήρας κλαρινέτου Bb/A; Γενικής χρήσης/ρυθμιζόμενος; Χρήση του παρεχόμενου σφιγκτήρα; Άλλο
ko: 호환 클라리넷 마우스피스 리가처: 독일/욀러(내로우) 리가처; 오버사이즈/라지 보어 리가처; 표준 Bb/A 클라리넷 리가처; 범용/조정 가능; 포함된 리가처 사용; 기타
da: Kompatibel mundstykkeligatur til klarinet: Tysk/Oehler (smal) ligatur; Overstørrelse/ligatur til stor boring; Standard Bb/A-klarinetligatur; Universal/justerbar; Brug medfølgende ligatur; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместима лигатура за мундщук на кларинет: Немска/Oehler (тясна) лигатура; Овърсайз лигатура/за голям отвор; Стандартна лигатура за Bb/A кларинет; Универсална/регулируема; Използване на включената лигатура; Друго
sl-SI: Združljiva ligatura za ustnik klarinet: Nemška/Oehlerjeva (ozka) ligatura; Prevelika ligatura/ligatura s široko odprtino; Standardna ligatura za Bb/A klarinet; Univerzalna/nastavljiva; Uporabi priloženo ligaturo; Drugo
cs: Kompatibilní ligatura pro náustek pro klarinet: Německá/Oehlerova (úzká) ligatura; Zvětšená / s velkým vrtáním; Standardní ligatura pro Bb/A klarinet; Univerzální/nastavitelná; Použít přiloženou ligaturu; Jiné
sv: Kompatibel ligatur för klarinettmunstycke: Tysk/Oehler (smal) ligatur; Extra stor/grovborrad ligatur; Standardligatur för Bb/A-klarinett; Universell/justerbar; Använd medföljande ligatur; Annat
sk-SK: Kompatibilná ligatúra náustku pre klarinet: Nemecká/Oehlerova (úzka) ligatúra; Zväčšená ligatúra pre široké vŕtanie; Štandardná ligatúra pre B/A klarinet; Univerzálna/nastaviteľná; Použiť priloženú ligatúru; Iné